DI-765
DIAGNOSTICS - ENGINEIMMOBILISERSYSTEM (2UZ -FE)

DI1AV-09

DTC B2798/99 | Communication malfunction No.2

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
*Key
 Transponder Key Coll
B2798/99 Communication error  Transponder Key Amplifier
*Wireharness
*Engineand ECT ECU
WIRING DIAGRAM
J11 J/C
A A Transponder Key Coil ;
* P y Engineand ECT ECU
B-Y, ( \
7 B- A 2 12
pd
5 IG2K <5~ -z (E11] coDE
3 13
| Vare (E11] RXCK
Cowl Side J/B LH
(E11] TXCT
2D RY &)
W-B
\/ G
to Battery
= ——

*1:LHD models
*2: RHD models
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LAND CRUISER (W/G) (RM6 16E)



DI-766
DIAGNOSTICS - ENGINE IMMOBILISER SYSTEM (2UZ-FE)

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check transponder key coil (See page BE-175).

NG> Replace transponder key coil.

@

2 | Check harness and connector between transponder key amplifier and Engine
and ECT ECU.

NG> Repair or replace harness and connector.

@

3 [ Does the system operate normally after replacement of transponder key amplifi-
er?

Yes> Replace transponder key amplifier.

@

Replace Engine and ECT ECU.

LAND CRUISER (W/G) (RM616E)



